Hawaii statutes.
PART 3.
TRANSFER OF CERTIFICATED

AND
UNCERTIFICATED SECURITIES

§490:8-301 Delivery. (a) Delivery of
a certificated security to a purchaser occurs when:

(1) The purchaser acquires possession of the security
certificate;

(2) Another person, other than a securities
intermediary, either acquires possession of the security certificate on behalf
of the purchaser or, having previously acquired possession of the certificate,
acknowledges that it holds for the purchaser; or

(3) A securities intermediary acting on behalf of the
purchaser acquires possession of the security certificate, only if the
certificate is in registered form and is:

(A) Registered in the name of the purchaser;

(B) Payable to the order of the purchaser; or

(C) Specially indorsed to the purchaser by an
effective indorsement and has not been indorsed to the securities intermediary
or in blank.

(b) Delivery of an uncertificated security to
a purchaser occurs when:

(1) The issuer registers the purchaser as the
registered owner, upon original issue or registration of transfer; or

(2) Another person, other than a securities
intermediary, either becomes the registered owner of the uncertificated
security on behalf of the purchaser or, having previously become the registered
owner, acknowledges that it holds for the purchaser. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2;
am L 2000, c 241, §25]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next